Maine, session 132, LD1330.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §2 and
affected by §29 and enacted by c. 673, §2 and affected by §28, is amended to read:
5-D. Lease or rental. "Lease or rental," "lease" or "rental" means any transfer of
possession or control of tangible personal property for a fixed or indeterminate term for
consideration and may include future options to purchase the property or extend the lease
or rental. "Lease or rental" includes a sublease and subrental.
"Lease or rental" does not include:
A. Leases and contracts payable by rental or license fees for the right of possession
and use when such leases and contracts are determined by the assessor to be in lieu of
purchase;
B. A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or
deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required
payments;
C. Providing tangible personal property along with a person to operate that property,
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time, when that person is necessary for the
tangible personal property to perform as designed and the person does more than
maintain, inspect or set up the tangible personal property; or
D. The lease or rental of property that is subject to the provisions of the service
provider tax imposed pursuant to chapter 358.; or
E. Leases, licenses, subscriptions or similar rights to use or access software when the
lessee, licensee, subscriber or user is a business.
The characterization of a transaction as a lease or rental under generally accepted
accounting principles, the Code, the Uniform Commercial Code or other provisions of
federal, state or local law does not affect a determination that a transaction is a lease or
rental under chapters 211 to 225.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies only to leases, licenses, subscriptions or
similar rights to use or access software entered into or renewed after the effective date of
this Act.